ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.aff
# rule/flag 35 (affects 16893 words, has 824 subrules):
flag d:
	U G A	>	-GA,D
	I G A	>	-GA,DUS
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSE
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSED
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEDKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEGA
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEGAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEID
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEIDKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEIGA
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEIGAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEIKS
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEIKSKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEIL
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEILE
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEILEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEILGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEILT
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEILTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEINA
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEINAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEINI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEINIGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEIS
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEISKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEISSE
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEISSEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEIST
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEISTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEITA
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEITAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEKS
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEKSKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEL
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSELE
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSELEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSELGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSELT
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSELTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSENA
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSENAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSENI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSENIGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSES
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSESKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSESSE
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSESSEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSEST
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSESTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSETA
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSETAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSIGA
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSIGAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSIGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSIKS
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSIKSKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSIL
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSILE
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSILEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSILGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSILT
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSILTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSINA
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSINAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSINI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSINIGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSIS
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSISKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSISSE
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSISSEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSIST
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSISTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSITA
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSITAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSSE
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSSEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUST
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTE
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTEGA
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTEGAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTEKS
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTEKSKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTEL
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTELE
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTELEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTELGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTELT
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTELTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTENA
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTENAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTENI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTENIGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTES
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTESKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTESSE
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTESSEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTEST
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTESTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTETA
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTETAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DUSTKI
	E G A	>	-GA,STI
	E G A	>	-GA,STIGI
	A G A	>	-GA,T
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AB
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ABKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AD
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ADKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AKS
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AKSID
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AKSIDKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AKSIME
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AKSIMEGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AKSIN
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AKSINGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AKSITE
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AKSITEGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AKSKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AME
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AMEGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AN
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ANGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ATE
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ATEGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AVAD
	T N U D	>	-NUD,AVADKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,DA
	[AL] N U D	>	-NUD,DAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAGU
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAGUGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAKSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAKSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATU
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUD
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUDKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUGA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUGAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUID
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIDKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIGA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIGAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIL
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUILE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUILEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUILGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUILT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUILTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUINA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUINAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUINI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUINIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUISKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUISSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUISSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIST
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUISTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUITA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUITAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUL
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATULE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATULEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATULGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATULT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATULTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUNA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUNAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUNI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUNIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUSSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUSSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUST
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUSTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTEGA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTEGAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTEKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTEKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTEL
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTELE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTELEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTELGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTELT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTELTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTENA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTENAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTENI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTENIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTES
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTESKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTESSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTESSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTEST
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTESTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTETA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTETAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAV
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAD
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVADKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAGA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAGAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAID
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIDKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIGA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIGAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIL
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAILE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAILEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAILGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAILT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAILTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAINA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAINAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAINI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAINIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAISKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAISSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAISSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIST
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAISTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAITA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAITAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAL
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVALE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVALEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVALGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVALT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVALTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVANA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVANAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVANI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVANIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVASKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVASSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVASSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAST
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVASTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATEGA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATEGAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATEKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATEKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATEL
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATELE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATELEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATELGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATELT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATELTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATENA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATENAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATENI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATENIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATES
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATESKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATESSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATESSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATEST
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATESTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATETA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATETAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSED
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEDKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEGA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEGAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEID
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIDKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIGA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIGAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIL
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEILE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEILEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEILGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEILT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEILTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEINA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEINAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEINI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEINIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEISKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEISSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEISSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIST
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEISTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEITA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEITAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEL
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSELE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSELEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSELGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSELT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSELTKI
