ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.dict
aeglematuga/abcdefgkmoy
ahkinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
aknastikuga/acdegimy
alkeemiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
amoraalsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
ankeeditavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
aplavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
arktilisega/abdhjlmny
asemikuga/acdegimy
asulaga/abcdefgikmnoy
autenditavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
batikuga/abcdefgikmoy
bolğevikuga/acdegimy
defileerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
despootlikuga/acdegjlmy
dionüüsilisega/abdhjlmny
draamaga/abcdfghiky
eefeuga/acdeghimy
ekraniseeringuga/abcdefgikmoy
ekvilibristikaga/abcdefgikmnoy
eminentsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
epidermofüütiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
esitatuga/abcdefgikmoy
evakueerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
fermentinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
formaadilisega/abdhjlmny
fötaalsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
germanistikaga/abcdefgikmnoy
gümnastikaga/abcdefgikmnoy
haisutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hamletlikuga/acdegjlmy
haruldasega/abdhjlmny
heitlikuga/acdegjlmy
helmintoloogilisega/abdhjlmny
hiiruga/acdeghjlmy
hobuslikuga/acdegjlmy
hoovanguga/abcdefgikmoy
humalaga/abcdefgikmnoy
hämmastavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
hõikavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
hüdrolüüsinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hüüdlematuga/abcdefgkmoy
iilinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
immunoloogiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
inglannaga/abcdfghiky
intiimsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
jaksuga/acdeghimy
juhtmestikuga/acdegimy
järsandikuga/acdegimy
kaarestikuga/acdegimy
kaisuga/acdegimy
kalliga/acdejlmnoy
kangelannaga/abcdfghiky
kartoteegitamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
kaustalisega/abdhjlmny
kemplejaga/abcdefgkmnoy
kiidelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kinemaatikaga/abcdefgikmnoy
kiustanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kobrutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
koljuga/abcdeghimy
kongitamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
koorelisega/abdhjlmny
kotilisega/abdhjlmny
kristlikuga/acdegjlmy
kujulikuga/acdegjlmy
kurrustikuga/acdegimy
käidelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
käänulisega/abdhjlmny
kõplavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
külgmikuga/acdegimy
ladinaga/abcdefgikmnoy
lakutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lausemaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
lengerdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
liikvaga/abcdefgikmnoy
liuga/acdegimy
loobitamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
lullitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lärmakaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
lõsinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
madalmikuga/acdegimy
mandrilisega/abdhjlmny
mehaanilisega/abdhjlmny
minduga/abcdefgijklmnoy
muhklikuga/acdegjlmy
muusikaga/abcdefgikmnoy
mõistuga/acdeghimy
müntinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
narkoloogiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
niitjaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
nostalgiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
näilisega/abdehjklmnoy
nõlvakuga/abcdefgikmoy
ohutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
orgiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
pahistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pandeemiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
passijaga/abcdefgikmnoy
pekslevaga/abcdefgkmnoy
piiniaga/abcdefgikmnoy
pintsakuga/abcdefgikmoy
pliginaga/abcdefgikmnoy
ponnistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
preambulaga/abcdefgikmnoy
pruntinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pulberjaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
puugitavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
põiminguga/abcdefgikmoy
pühitamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
rahvuselisega/abdhjlmny
ravilaga/abcdefgikmnoy
resorbeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rinnutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
roosaga/abcdfghikly
rändavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
röövinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
saiakuga/abcdefgikmoy
sasinaga/abcdefgikmnoy
selgusetuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
sihilisega/abdhjlmny
sisalikuga/acdegimy
solksatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sosiskelnud/abcdfghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
strukturalistlikuga/acdegjlmy
sunnitavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
säratuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
söödetamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
süüdimatuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
talendikaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
tasuvaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
tellinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tiirelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tohuga/acdeghimy
toristanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tripsuga/acdeghimy
tuiklematuga/abcdefgkmoy
tursesega/abdehjklmnoy
täpituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
töllerdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
uhanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
urvakaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
vahedaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
valjendanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vaskjaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
verandaga/abcdfghiky
viimikuga/abcdefgikmoy
vinnilisega/abdhjlmny
vooluga/acdeghimy
väljalisega/abdhjlmny
võimaldanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
võtjaga/abcdefgikmnoy
õginud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
örinaga/abcdefgikmnoy
